Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5765.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 801l. (1) Beginning on January 1, 2027, in addition to a vehicle registration tax charged under section 801, an electric vehicle, self-charging hybrid electric vehicle, or plug-in hybrid electric vehicle is subject to a tax as provided for in this section. (2) An owner or lessee of an electric vehicle, self-charging hybrid electric vehicle, or plug-in hybrid electric vehicle shall pay the electric vehicle flat tax under subsection (3) or the miles-traveled tax under subsection (4). The owner may elect which tax to pay at the owner's discretion. (3) Subject to subsection (12), an owner or lessee of an electric vehicle, self-charging hybrid electric vehicle, or plug-in hybrid electric vehicle that elects to pay the electric vehicle flat tax shall pay the following applicable tax each registration year: (a) For a self-charging hybrid electric vehicle or plug-in hybrid electric vehicle, 1 of the following: (i) If the vehicle's fuel tax discount is greater than or equal to the road usage charge, $0.00. (ii) If the vehicle's fuel tax discount is less than the road usage charge, an amount equal to 13,000 times the quantity equal to the road usage charge minus the vehicle's fuel discount. (b) For an electric vehicle, an amount equal to 13,000 times the road usage charge. (4) Subject to subsections (12) and (16), an owner or lessee of an electric vehicle, self-charging hybrid electric vehicle, or plug-in hybrid electric vehicle that elects to pay the miles-traveled tax shall pay a tax as follows: (a) At the time of purchase or transfer, no additional miles-traveled tax. (b) For each registration year after the registration under subdivision (a), 1 of the following, as applicable: (i) For an electric vehicle, the road usage charge. (ii) For a plug-in hybrid electric vehicle or a self-charging hybrid electric vehicle, the road usage charge minus the vehicle's fuel tax discount per mile traveled, rounded to the nearest whole dollar. If the amount calculated under this subdivision is $0.00 or less, then $0.00 per mile traveled. (5) A participating vehicle owner shall agree to allow a miles-traveled tax program account manager to report to the secretary of state the number of miles displayed on the vehicle's odometer, miles-traveled billings, taxes collected, and all other miles-traveled tax information that the secretary of state considers reasonable or necessary to administer this section and the miles-traveled tax program. The account manager shall submit the report in a form and manner as prescribed by the secretary of state. (6) The secretary of state may use the money from the tax collected under this section only to administer this section. Money from the tax that is not used as described in this subsection must be deposited in the Michigan transportation fund established in section 10 of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.660. (7) An account manager shall not report a number of miles under subsection (5) if the account manager knows that the number is not accurate. On receiving notice that a report is not accurate, an account manager shall correct the report not more than 10 days after the date of notice. If the account manager does not correct the report in the time specified under this subsection, in addition to any other applicable sanction or penalty provided for by law, the account manager is subject to a fine of not more than $1,000.00, revocation of the contract under subsection (9), or both. The secretary of state may bring an action to collect the fine. A fine collected under this subsection must be deposited in the Michigan transportation fund established in section 10 of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.660. (8) A participating vehicle owner shall not set back, or disconnect the vehicle's odometer, or cause or allow the vehicle's odometer to be altered, set back, or disconnected, for the purpose of misrepresenting the number of miles reported under subsection (5). In addition to any other applicable sanction or penalty provided for by law, a participating vehicle owner who violates this subsection is subject to a fine of not more than $1,000.00. The secretary of state may bring an action to collect the fine. A fine collected under this subsection must be deposited in the Michigan transportation fund established in section 10 of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.660. (9) The secretary of state may contract with an account manager to enroll vehicle owners or lessees in the miles-traveled tax program, calculate miles-traveled tax bills for participating vehicle owners, charge participating vehicle owners based on miles traveled in this state, and manage miles-based user fees for vehicle owners. An account manager contracted under this subsection shall do all of the following: (a) Use the most cost-effective methodologies and highly automated and advanced technology available to accurately calculate the amount due for each participating vehicle owner. (b) Identify all miles traveled by participating vehicles and bill participating vehicle owners appropriately, including any reduction in the amount owed under the miles-traveled tax program due to estimated gas taxes paid during the billing period. (c) Provide participating vehicle owners a cost-effective, highly automated, and technologically advanced method to accurately collect odometer data. (d) Bill participating vehicle owners not less than 1 time a month, unless less frequent billing is requested by the participating vehicle owner in a manner prescribed by the secretary of state. (e) Collect amounts due from participating vehicle owners in coordination with the secretary of state. (f) Report late and delinquent accounts to the secretary of state on a monthly basis. (g) Determine a plug-in electric vehicle's or a self-charging hybrid electric vehicle's miles per gallon rating, as determined by the United States Environmental Protection Agency for that vehicle, to calculate the miles-traveled tax under subsection(4)(b). (10) The secretary of state shall, in addition to other factors the secretary of state deems relevant, use the following to determine who to award the account manager contract to under this section: (a) Efficiency of the proposed candidate. (b) Cost-effectiveness of the proposed candidate. (c) Customer experience for participating vehicle owners. (11) The secretary of state and the account manager shall reduce a participating vehicle owner's miles-traveled tax bill based on the number of miles driven outside this state. The secretary of state shall prescribe procedures and forms to allow participating vehicle owners to record any miles driven outside of this state and to allow the secretary of state or an account manager to reduce a participating vehicle owner's miles-traveled tax bill based on the number of miles driven outside of this state. A participating vehicle owner shall submit approved forms and documentation to the account manager to provide evidence that the vehicle was used outside of this state. Unless approved documentation is provided, the department and account manager shall assume that all vehicle miles were driven in this state and are subject to the miles-traveled tax. The account manager shall manage and process the submissions and reimbursements. At least 1 time every year, the account manager shall audit 3% of submissions. (12) The miles-traveled tax must not exceed the flat tax imposed on electric vehicles, self-charging hybrid electric vehicles, and plug-in hybrid electric vehicles. (13) The secretary of state shall not share data with an account manager except to reduce the cost of the miles-traveled tax program. (14) If the secretary of state shares data under subsection (13), the secretary of state shall provide the necessary technical, physical, and administrative safeguards to protect the privacy of a participating vehicle owner. (15) The secretary of state shall ensure that a participating vehicle owner is able to make payment for the participating vehicle owner's miles-traveled tax bills through an online portal at no additional cost for an ACH or other similar payment method. The online portal must also allow a participating vehicle owner to make payments using a credit card or other similar method and may charge a transaction fee for a credit card, or other similar method, payment. (16) The secretary of state shall specify a daily enrollment fee that may be charged by an account manager to a participating vehicle owner based on the anticipated lost tax revenue between the date the vehicle owner or lessee elects to participate in the miles-traveled tax program and the date the first bill is generated for that participating vehicle owner under the miles-traveled tax program. The daily enrollment fee must not exceed 1/365 of the flat tax amount that the participating vehicle owner would be subject to if the participating vehicle owner had elected not to participate in the miles-traveled program. (17) A participating vehicle owner who elects to pay the miles-traveled tax under subsection (4) shall submit payment for the miles-traveled tax not more than 30 days after receiving a bill. Payments submitted more than 30 days after receiving a bill are late and subject to a late fee as determined by the secretary of state, in consultation with the account manager. Payments submitted 61 days or more after a bill is received are considered delinquent. Any delinquent payments under this section shall be collected by the department of treasury under 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.1 to 205.31, and deposited in the Michigan transportation fund established in section 10 of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.660. (18) As used in this section: (a) "Account manager" means an account manager that the secretary of state contracts with under subsection (9). (b) "ACH" means automated clearing house as that term is defined in section 1 of 2002 PA 738, MCL 124.301. (c) "Alternative fuel" means that term as defined in section 151 of the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1151. (d) "Diesel fuel" means that term as defined in section 2 of the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1002. (e) "Electric vehicle" means a vehicle that is propelled solely by electrical energy and that is not capable of using gasoline, diesel fuel, or alternative fuel to propel the vehicle. (f) "Fuel tax discount" means an amount equal to the motor fuel tax divided by the plug-in electric vehicle's or the self-charging hybrid electric vehicle's miles per gallon rating, as determined by the United States Environmental Protection Agency for that vehicle. (g) "Gasoline" means that term as defined in section 3 of the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1003. (h) "Miles traveled" means the difference between the number of miles displayed on the vehicle's odometer at the time of registration and the number of miles displayed on the vehicle's odometer at the time of the immediately preceding registration. (i) "Motor fuel tax" means the tax on gasoline imposed under section 8 of the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1008. (j) "Participating vehicle owner" means the owner or lessee of an electric vehicle, self-charging hybrid electric vehicle, or plug-in hybrid electric vehicle that has elected to pay the miles-traveled tax under subsection (4). (k) "Plug-in hybrid electric vehicle" means a vehicle that can use batteries to power an electric motor and use another fuel, such as gasoline or diesel, to power an internal combustion engine or other propulsion source and that may use electricity from the grid to run the vehicle some or all of the time. (l) "Road usage charge" means 1/25 of the tax on gasoline per gallon imposed under section 8 of the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1008, rounded to the nearest 1/10 of 1 cent. (m) "Self-charging hybrid electric vehicle" means a vehicle that can use batteries to power an electric motor that propels the vehicle and another fuel source, such as gasoline or diesel, to power an internal combustion engine or other propulsion source that can propel the vehicle and also charge the batteries used to power the electric motor by running the internal combustion engine and by regenerative braking. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5766 (request no. H02728'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.